Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.620

Change of address information for mail ballots—Assignment of voter to inactive status—Confirmation notice. (Effective until June 1, 2025.)

(1) Each county auditor must request change of address information from the postal service for all mail ballots.

(2) The county auditor shall transfer the registration of a voter and send an acknowledgment notice to the new address informing the voter of the transfer if change of address information received by the county auditor from the postal service, the department of licensing, or another agency designated to provide voter registration services indicates that the voter has moved within the county.

(3) The county auditor shall place a voter on inactive status and send to all known addresses a confirmation notice and a voter registration application if change of address information received by the county auditor from the postal service, the department of licensing, or another agency designated to provide voter registration services indicates that the voter has moved from one county to another.

(4) The county auditor shall place a voter on inactive status and send to all known addresses a confirmation notice if any of the following occur:

(a) Any document mailed by the county auditor to a voter is returned by the postal service as undeliverable without address correction information; or

(b) Change of address information received from the postal service, the department of licensing, or another state agency designated to provide voter registration services indicates that the voter has moved out of the state.

[ 2011 c 10 s 17; 2009 c 369 s 29. Prior: 2004 c 267 s 130; 2004 c 266 s 8; 2003 c 111 s 239; prior: 1994 c 57 s 38. Formerly RCW 29.10.071.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Effective date—2004 c 266: See note following RCW 29A.04.575.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.

PDFRCW 29A.08.620

Change of address information for mail ballots—Assignment of voter to inactive status—Confirmation notice. (Effective June 1, 2025.)

(1) Each county auditor must request change of address information from the postal service for all mail ballots.

(2)(a) If change of address information received by the county auditor from the postal service, the department of licensing, or another agency designated to provide voter registration services indicates that the voter has moved within the county, the county auditor shall update the registration address for the voter's registration and send an acknowledgment notice to the new address informing the voter of the update.

(b) If the change of address information indicates the voter has moved out of the county but within the state:

(i) The county auditor shall notify the auditor of the voter's new county of residence of the change; and

(ii) The county auditor of the voter's new county of residence shall update the registration information of the voter to the new address within the county and send an acknowledgment notice to the new address informing the voter of the update.

(c) If the information indicates the voter has moved to a residence outside the state, the county auditor shall place the voter's registration on inactive status and send to all known addresses a confirmation notice. Such information may include any of the following:

(i) Any document mailed by the county auditor to a voter is returned by the postal service as undeliverable without address correction information; or

(ii) Change of address information received from the postal service, the department of licensing, or another state agency designated to provide voter registration services indicates that the voter has moved out of the state.

[ 2024 c 56 s 2; 2011 c 10 s 17; 2009 c 369 s 29. Prior: 2004 c 267 s 130; 2004 c 266 s 8; 2003 c 111 s 239; prior: 1994 c 57 s 38. Formerly RCW 29.10.071.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 56: See note following RCW 29A.08.410.

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Effective date—2004 c 266: See note following RCW 29A.04.575.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.